Hawaii statutes.
[§87A‑16.3] Prescription
drugs; mail order opt out option. A Hawaii employer-union health benefits
trust fund health benefits plan shall permit each beneficiary to fill any
covered prescription in accordance with chapter 431R. [L 2013, c 226, §3]

Note

Applicability of L 2013, c 226. L 2013, c 226, §§5, 8.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next